Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1001.
do enact as follows:SB1001,11Section 1. 20.445 (1) (w) of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,3,6220.445 (1) (w) Family and medical leave insurance trust fund. From the 3family and medical leave insurance trust fund, all moneys deposited in that fund 4under s. 103.105 (9) for the payments of family or medical leave insurance benefits 5under s. 103.105 (3) and for the administration of the family and medical leave 6insurance program under s. 103.105.SB1001,27Section 2. 25.17 (1) (er) of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,3,8825.17 (1) (er) Family and medical leave insurance trust fund (s. 25.52);SB1001,39Section 3. 25.52 of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,3,131025.52 Family and medical leave insurance trust fund. There is created 11a separate nonlapsible trust fund designated as the family and medical leave 12insurance trust fund, to consist of all moneys deposited in that fund under s. 13103.105 (9).SB1001,41Section 4. 103.10 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 103.10 (1) (a) 2and amended to read:SB1001,4,53103.10 (1) (a) “Child” means a natural, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a 4child for whom the individual stood or stands in the place of a parent, or a legal 5ward to whom any of the following applies:.SB1001,56Section 5. 103.10 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is repealed.SB1001,67Section 6. 103.10 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB1001,78Section 7. 103.10 (1) (an) of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,4,99103.10 (1) (an) “Covered active duty” means any of the following:SB1001,4,11101. For a member of a regular component of the U.S. armed forces, duty during 11the deployment of the member with the U.S. armed forces.SB1001,4,14122. For a member of a reserve component of the U.S. armed forces, duty during 13the deployment of the member with the U.S. armed forces under a call or order to 14active duty under a provision of law specified in 10 USC 101 (a) (13) (B).SB1001,815Section 8. 103.10 (1) (ao) of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,4,1616103.10 (1) (ao) “Domestic abuse” has the meaning given in s. 968.075 (1) (a).SB1001,917Section 9. 103.10 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1001,4,2018103.10 (1) (b) Except as provided in sub. (1m) (b) 2. and s. 452.38, “employee” 19means an individual employed in this state by an employer, except the employer’s 20parent, spouse, domestic partner, or child.SB1001,1021Section 10. 103.10 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1001,5,422103.10 (1) (c) Except as provided in sub. (1m) (b) 3., “employer” “Employer” 23means a person engaging in any activity, enterprise, or business in this state 1employing at least 50 individuals on a permanent basis. “Employer” includes the 2state and any office, department, independent agency, authority, institution, 3association, society, or other body in state government created or authorized to be 4created by the constitution or any law, including the legislature and the courts.SB1001,115Section 11. 103.10 (1) (db) of the statutes is created to read:SB1001,5,126103.10 (1) (db) “Family member” means a spouse or domestic partner of an 7employee; a parent, child, sibling, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, grandparent, 8stepgrandparent, or grandchild of an employee or of an employee’s spouse or 9domestic partner; or any other person who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption 10to an employee or to an employee’s spouse or domestic partner or whose close 11association with the employee, spouse, or domestic partner makes the person the 12equivalent of a family member of the employee, spouse, or domestic partner. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1001 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1001 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1001 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1001 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1001: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting